Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5644YH (7) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2127 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 232.52B Parental participation in 1 classes. 2 1. If a child is adjudicated to have committed a delinquent 3 act, and the child is ordered by the court to attend a class as 4 a part of the childâs dispositional order, then the court shall 5 order the childâs parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian to 6 attend the class with the child. 7 2. If a child has been adjudicated to have committed a 8 delinquent act three or more times, the court shall require the 9 childâs parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian to attend a 10 parental responsibility class. 11 3. A parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian who fails to 12 comply with this section commits a public offense. 13 a. A first offense is a simple misdemeanor and a conviction 14 is punishable by confinement for up to ten days or a fine of 15 up to one hundred dollars. The court may order the parent, 16 legal guardian, or legal custodian to perform not more than 17 forty hours of unpaid community service instead of a fine or 18 confinement. 19 b. A second offense is a serious misdemeanor and a 20 conviction is punishable by confinement for up to twenty days, 21 or a fine of up to five hundred dollars, or both a fine and 22 confinement. The court may order the parent, legal guardian, 23 or legal custodian to perform unpaid community service instead 24 of a fine or confinement. 25 c. A third or subsequent offense is a serious misdemeanor 26 and a conviction is punishable by confinement for up to thirty 27 days, a fine of up to one thousand dollars, or both. The 28 court may order the parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian 29 to perform unpaid community service instead of a fine or 30 confinement. 31 4. If a parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian has made 32 a good-faith effort to comply with this section, the parent, 33 legal guardian, or legal custodian may file an affidavit 34 listing the good-faith effort made by the parent, legal 35 -1- LSB 5644YH (7) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 2127 guardian, or legal custodian. Upon court approval of the 1 affidavit, the parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian shall 2 not be criminally liable for noncompliance. 3 5. This section shall not apply to a parent who does 4 not have physical care of the parentâs child, and shall not 5 apply to a legal guardian or a legal custodian who is not an 6 individual. 7 6. The department shall adopt rules to implement this 8 section. 9 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 10 by adding the following new paragraph: 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . x. Be subject to and comply with the 12 requirements of section 279.89 relating to reverse punitive 13 measures. 14 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 17 requirements of section 279.89 relating to reverse punitive 18 measures. 19